Illinois, session 104th, HB4814.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Debt Management Service Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4 and 12 as follows: 6    (205 ILCS 665/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5304)7    Sec. 4. Application for license. Application for a license 8to engage in the debt management service business in this 9State shall be made to the Secretary and shall be in writing, 10under oath, and in the form prescribed by the Secretary.11    Each applicant, at the time of making such application, 12shall pay to the Secretary the sum of $30.00 as a fee for 13investigation of the applicant, and the additional sum of 14$100.00 as a license fee.15    Every applicant shall submit to the Secretary, at the time 16of the application for a license, a bond to be approved by the 17Secretary in which the applicant shall be the obligor, in the 18sum of $50,000 $25,000 or such additional amount as required 19by the Secretary based on the amount of disbursements made by 20the licensee in the previous year, and in which an insurance 21company, which is duly authorized by the State of Illinois, to 22transact the business of fidelity and surety insurance shall 23be a surety.  HB4814 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16531 BAB 29927 b1    The bond shall run to the Secretary for the use of the 2Department or of any person or persons who may have a cause of 3action against the obligor in said bond arising out of any 4violation of this Act or rules by a license. Such bond shall be 5conditioned that the obligor will faithfully conform to and 6abide by the provisions of this Act and of all rules, 7regulations and directions lawfully made by the Secretary and 8will pay to the Secretary or to any person or persons any and 9all money that may become due or owing to the State or to such 10person or persons, from said obligor under and by virtue of the 11provisions of this Act.12(Source: P.A. 96-1420, eff. 8-3-10.) 13    (205 ILCS 665/12)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5312)14    Sec. 12. Fees and charges of debt management service 15providers. A debt management service provider may not charge a 16debtor any fees or penalties except the following:17        (1) an initial counseling fee not to exceed $75 $50 18    per debtor counseled; and19        (2) additional fees at the completion of the initial 20    counseling services, which shall not exceed per month: (A) 21    15% of the amount disbursed monthly to creditors or $75, 22    whichever is less, if there are fewer than 6 creditors 23    enrolled in the debt management plan; or (B) 15% of the 24    amount disbursed monthly to creditors or $100, whichever 25    is less, if there are 6 or more creditors enrolled in the   HB4814 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16531 BAB 29927 b1    debt management plan $50 per month. 2(Source: P.A. 96-1420, eff. 8-3-10.)